New Mexico, session 2026, HB301.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of the Department of Information Technology Act is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY PROJECTS--DUTIES.-- A. The department may enter into agreements to undertake, where feasible, information technology projects for any branch of the judiciary. B. The department may, in compliance with the Procurement Code, establish price agreements with vendors for information technology goods and services. C. On July 1, 2027, and on July 1 of each subsequent year, the department shall provide a catalog listing the information technology goods and services it has available to offer with the approved rates. D. The department may require a non-agency customer to comply with all rules and guidance applicable to a department-provided good or service but shall not require a non-agency customer to comply with any other law administered by the department unless otherwise provided by law. The department shall only access non-agency data as necessary to establish and maintain goods and services it has made available to non-agency customers." SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION.--One million two hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the administrative office of the district attorneys for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 for the purchase, in consultation with the department of information technology, of technology goods and services for the use of district attorneys statewide. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -